Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,122.03
Military Honor Plates; designs; issuance, when; eligibility.

(1) The department shall design license plates to be known as Military Honor Plates.

(2)(a) The department shall create a design for each of the following armed forces that honors persons who have served or are serving in the:

(i) United States Army;

(ii) United States Army Reserve;

(iii) United States Navy;

(iv) United States Navy Reserve;

(v) United States Marine Corps;

(vi) United States Marine Corps Reserve;

(vii) United States Coast Guard;

(viii) United States Coast Guard Reserve;

(ix) United States Air Force;

(x) United States Air Force Reserve; or

(xi) United States Space Force.

(b) The department shall create a design for each of the following armed forces that honors persons who have served or are serving in the:

(i) Air National Guard; or

(ii) Army National Guard.

(3) The design for each of the armed forces specified in subsection (2) of this section shall reflect the official emblem, official seal, or other official image of such armed forces. The issuance of plates for each of such armed forces shall be conditioned on the approval of the armed forces owning the copyright to the official emblem, official seal, or other official image.

(4) The department shall create six additional designs honoring persons who are serving or have served in the armed forces of the United States and who have been awarded the Afghanistan Campaign Medal, Iraq Campaign Medal, Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal, Southwest Asia Service Medal, Vietnam Service Medal, or Inherent Resolve Campaign Medal.

(5) The department shall create the following additional designs honoring persons who are serving or have served in the armed forces of the United States:

(a) One design that includes the word "veteran"; and

(b) One design that includes the word "veteran" and the internationally accepted wheelchair symbol specified in section 60-3,113.

(6)(a) A person may qualify for a Military Honor Plate by registering with the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section 80-414. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall verify the applicant's eligibility for a plate created pursuant to this section by consulting the registry established by the Department of Veterans' Affairs.

(b) To be eligible for the license plates described in subdivision (5)(b) of this section, in addition to any other eligibility requirements for such license plates under this section:

(i) An application and proof of disability in the form and with the information required by section 60-3,113.02 shall be submitted before issuance or reissuance of such license plates; and

(ii) The handicap or disability of the handicapped or disabled person shall be certified as permanent.

(7) The design shall be selected on the basis of limiting the manufacturing cost of each plate to an amount less than or equal to the amount charged for license plates pursuant to section 60-3,102. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make applications available for each type of plate when it is designed. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section and section 60-3,122.04.

(8) One type of Military Honor Plates shall be alphanumeric plates. The department shall:

(a) Assign a designation up to five characters; and

(b) Not use a county designation.

(9) One type of Military Honor Plates shall be personalized message plates. Such plates shall be issued subject to the same conditions specified for personalized message license plates in section 60-3,118, except that a maximum of five characters may be used.

(10) The department shall cease to issue Military Honor Plates beginning with the next license plate issuance cycle after the license plate issuance cycle that begins in 2023 pursuant to section 60-3,101 if the total number of registered vehicles that obtained such plates is less than one hundred per year within any prior consecutive two-year period.

Laws 2014, LB383, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB45, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB138, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB356, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 21;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 25;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 46.
July 18, 2026